Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-603
Department of Administrative Services; report; contents.

(1) The Department of Administrative Services shall create an annual report that includes:

(a) The total number and value of contracts awarded by the department;

(b) The total number and value of contracts awarded by the department to contractors within this state; and

(c) The total number and value of contracts awarded by the department to foreign contractors.

(2) Such report shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature on or before September 1 each year and shall include the required information from the most recent fiscal year ending prior to such date. The reports submitted to the Legislature and the Governor shall be submitted electronically. Each annual report shall be made available to the public through publication on the department's website on or before September 1 of each year.

Laws 2014, LB371, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 32.